Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 809.409 is amended to read:
809.409. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a record of conviction of  an offense described in this section, the
Department of Transportation shall revoke the driving privileges of the person convicted.
(b) A person is entitled  to administrative review under ORS 809.440 of a revocation under this
section.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,  the revocation shall
be for a period of one year from the date of revocation, except that  the department may not rein-
state driving privileges of any person  whose privileges are revoked under this section until the
person complies with future responsibility filings.
(2) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of aggravated vehicular homicide or aggravated driving while suspended  or revoked
or any degree  of murder, manslaughter or criminally negligent homicide resulting from the operation
of a motor vehicle or assault in the first degree resulting  from the operation of a motor vehicle,
except that the provisions of this subsection  do not apply to a person whose driving privileges are
ordered revoked under ORS  809.235. A person whose driving privileges are revoked under this sub-
section may apply for reinstatement of driving privileges:
(a) If the sentence for the crime for which the person’s driving privileges were revoked, or  any
other crimes arising from the same criminal  episode, includes incarceration, no sooner than 10 years
from the date the person is  released from incarceration for all crimes arising out of the same
criminal episode; or
(b) If the sentence for  the crime for which the person’s driving privileges were revoked and any
other crimes arising from the same criminal episode does not include incarceration, no sooner  than
10 years from the date the department revoked the privileges under this subsection.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, the  department shall take
action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record of conviction of  failure to per-
form the duties of a driver to injured persons under ORS 811.705.
(b) The  department shall revoke driving privileges under this subsection for a period of three
years if the court indicates on the record of conviction that a person sustained serious physical  in-
jury, as defined in ORS 161.015, as a result of the accident. The person may apply for reinstatement
Enrolled Senate Bill 343 (SB 343-A) Page 1
of privileges three years after the date the  person was released from incarceration, if the sentence
includes incarceration. If the sentence does not include incarceration, the person  may apply for
reinstatement three years from the date the revocation was imposed under this subsection.
(c) The department shall revoke driving privileges under this subsection for a  period of five
years if the court indicates  on the record of conviction that a person was killed as a result of the
accident. The person may apply for reinstatement of  privileges five years after the date the person
was released from incarceration, if the  sentence includes incarceration. If the sentence does not
include incarceration, the person may apply for reinstatement five years from the date the  revoca-
tion was imposed under this subsection.
(4) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of any felony with a material element involving the operation of a motor vehicle.
(5) As used in  this section, “incarceration” means confinement in a Department of Cor-
rections institution, as defined in ORS 421.005.
SECTION 2.  ORS 809.411 is amended to read:
809.411. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a record of conviction for an offense  described in this section, the
Department of Transportation shall suspend the driving privileges of the person convicted.
(b) A person is entitled to administrative review under ORS  809.440 of a suspension under this
section.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (7), (8) and (9)  of this section, the suspension
shall be for the  period of time described in Schedule I of ORS 809.428. The department may not
reinstate driving privileges of any person whose privileges are suspended under subsection  (2), (3),
(4), (5), (6) or (9) of this section until the person complies  with future responsibility filings. There is
no requirement of compliance with future responsibility filings if the person was suspended under
subsection (7) or (8) of this section.
(2) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of any degree of recklessly endangering another person, menacing  or criminal mischief
resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle.
(3) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of reckless driving under ORS 811.140.
(4) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of failure to perform duties of a driver when property is damaged under ORS 811.700.
(5) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer under ORS 811.540.
(6) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of reckless endangerment of highway workers under ORS 811.231 (1).
(7) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of criminal  trespass under ORS 164.245 that involves the operation of a motor vehicle.
A suspension under this subsection shall continue for a period of six months from the date  of sus-
pension.
(8) The department  shall take action under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a record
of conviction of an offense described  in ORS 809.310. A suspension under this subsection shall con-
tinue for a period of one year from the date of the suspension.
(9)(a) The department shall take action  under subsection (1) of this section upon receipt of a
record of conviction of assault in the second,  third or fourth degree resulting from the operation
of a motor vehicle.
(b) A person who is convicted of assault in the second degree and whose  driving privileges are
suspended under this subsection may apply for reinstatement of  driving privileges eight years from
the date the person is released from incarceration for the conviction, if the sentence  includes
incarceration. If the sentence for the conviction does not include incarceration, the person may ap-
ply for reinstatement of driving privileges eight years from the date the department suspended  the
privileges under this subsection.
Enrolled Senate Bill 343 (SB 343-A) Page 2
(c) A  person who is convicted of assault in the third degree and whose driving privileges are
suspended under this  subsection may apply for reinstatement of driving privileges five years from
the date the person is released from incarceration for the conviction, if the sentence  includes
incarceration. If the sentence for the conviction does not include incarceration, the person may ap-
ply for reinstatement of driving privileges  five years from the date the department suspended the
privileges under this subsection.
(d) A person who is  convicted of assault in the fourth degree and whose driving privileges are
suspended under this subsection may apply for reinstatement of driving privileges one year from  the
date the  person is released from incarceration for the conviction, if the sentence includes
incarceration. If the sentence for the conviction does not include incarceration, the person may ap-
ply for reinstatement of driving privileges one year  from the date the department suspended the
privileges under this subsection.
(10) As used in  this section, “incarceration” means confinement in a Department of
Corrections institution, as defined in ORS 421.005.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 809.409 and 809.411 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2023
Act apply to driving privileges suspended or revoked on or after the effective date of this 2023
Act.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 343 (SB 343-A) Page 3